Mississippi, session 2026, SB2924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. In addition to all other sums appropriated to the agency, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Disaster Assistance Trust Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for the purposes of defraying expenses related to the state obligations for disaster response and recovery, including the severe weather event beginning on January 24, 2026, for the period beginning upon passage of this act, and ending June 30, 2027....................................................... ............................................... $ 20,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that this additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses of the agency related to the state obligations for disaster response and recovery authorized under the Disaster Assistance Trust Fund, including the severe weather event beginning on January 24, 2026. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the Disaster Assistance Trust Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after passage.